test/src/morphology/N-otec_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - отец M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: оте́ц
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: отца́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: отца́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: отце́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: отцу́
      отец+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: отцо́м
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: отцы́
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: отцо́в
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: отцо́в
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: отца́х
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: отца́м
      отец+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: отца́ми
